Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.370

Lobbyist's employer. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom the lobbyist is compensated for acting as a lobbyist.

[ 2024 c 164 s 237.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.